California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(b) Minors under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court who are in need of protective services shall receive care, treatment, and guidance consistent with their best interest and the best interest of the public. Minors under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court as a consequence of delinquent conduct shall, in conformity with the interests of public safety and protection, receive care, treatment, and guidance that is consistent with their best interest, that holds them accountable for their behavior, and that is appropriate for their circumstances. This guidance may include punishment that is consistent with the rehabilitative objectives of this chapter. If a minor has been removed from the custody of his or her parents, family preservation and family reunification are appropriate goals for the juvenile court to consider when determining the disposition of a minor under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court as a consequence of delinquent conduct when those goals are consistent with his or her best interests and the best interests of the public. When the minor is no longer a ward of the juvenile court, the guidance he or she received should enable him or her to be a law-abiding and productive member of his or her family and the community.

(c) It is also the purpose of this chapter to reaffirm that the duty of a parent to support and maintain a minor child continues, subject to the financial ability of the parent to pay, during any period in which the minor may be declared a ward of the court and removed from the custody of the parent.

(d) Juvenile courts and other public agencies charged with enforcing, interpreting, and administering the juvenile court law shall consider the safety and protection of the public, the importance of redressing injuries to victims, and the best interests of the minor in all deliberations pursuant to this chapter. Participants in the juvenile justice system shall hold themselves accountable for its results. They shall act in conformity with a comprehensive set of objectives established to improve system performance in a vigorous and ongoing manner. In working to improve system performance, the presiding judge of the juvenile court and other juvenile court judges designated by the presiding judge of the juvenile court shall take into consideration the recommendations contained in subdivision (e) of Standard 5.40 of Title 5 of the California Standards of Judicial Administration, contained in the California Rules of Court.

(e) As used in this chapter, “punishment” means the imposition of sanctions. It does not include retribution and shall not include a court order to place a child in foster care as defined by Section 727.3. Permissible sanctions may include any of the following:

(1) Payment of a fine by the minor.

(2) Rendering of compulsory service without compensation performed for the benefit of the community by the minor.

(3) Limitations on the minor’s liberty imposed as a condition of probation or parole.

(4) Commitment of the minor to a local detention or treatment facility, such as a juvenile hall, camp, or ranch.

(5) Commitment of the minor to the Division of Juvenile Facilities, Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(f) In addition to the actions authorized by subdivision (e), the juvenile court may, as appropriate, direct the offender to complete a victim impact class, participate in victim offender conferencing subject to the victim’s consent, pay restitution to the victim or victims, and make a contribution to the victim restitution fund after all victim restitution orders and fines have been satisfied, in order to hold the offender accountable or restore the victim or community.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 242.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

202.5.

The duties of the probation officer, as described in this chapter with respect to minors alleged or adjudged to be described by Section 300, whether or not delegated pursuant to Section 272, shall be deemed to be social service as defined by Section 10051, and subject to the administration, supervision and regulations of the State Department of Social Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 978, Sec. 3.   Effective September 13, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

203.

An order adjudging a minor to be a ward of the juvenile court shall not be deemed a conviction of a crime for any purpose, nor shall a proceeding in the juvenile court be deemed a criminal proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

204.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, except provisions of law governing the retention and storage of data, a family law court and a court hearing a probate guardianship matter shall, upon request from the juvenile court in any county, provide to the court all available information the court deems necessary to make a determination regarding the best interest of a child, as described in Section 202, who is the subject of a proceeding before the juvenile court pursuant to this division. The information shall also be released to a child protective services worker or juvenile probation officer acting within the scope of his or her duties in that proceeding. Any information released pursuant to this section that is confidential pursuant to any other provision of law shall remain confidential and may not be released, except to the extent necessary to comply with this section. No records shared pursuant to this section may be disclosed to any party in a case unless the party requests the agency or court that originates the record to release these records and the request is granted. In counties that provide confidential family law mediation, or confidential dependency mediation, those mediations are not covered by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 574, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

204.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the name of a minor may be disclosed to the public if the minor is 14 years of age or older and found by the juvenile court to be a person described in Section 602 as a result of a sustained petition for the commission of any of the offenses listed in Section 667.5 of the Penal Code, or in subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1019, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

205.

All commitments to institutions or for placement in family homes under this chapter shall be, so far as practicable, either to institutions or for placement in family homes of the same religious belief as that of the person so committed or of his parents or to institutions affording opportunity for instruction in such religious belief.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

206.

Persons taken into custody and persons alleged to be within the description of Section 300, or persons adjudged to be such and made dependent children of the court pursuant to this chapter solely upon that ground, shall be provided by the board of supervisors with separate facilities segregated from persons either alleged or adjudged to come within the description of Section 601 or 602 except as provided in Section 16514. Separate segregated facilities may be provided in the juvenile hall or elsewhere.

The facilities required by this section shall, with regard to minors alleged or adjudged to come within Section 300, be nonsecure.

For the purposes of this section, the term “secure facility” means a facility which is designed and operated so as to insure that all entrances to, and exits from, the facility are under the exclusive control of the staff of the facility, whether or not the person being detained has freedom of movement within the perimeters of the facility, or which relies on locked rooms and buildings, fences, or physical restraints in order to control behavior of its residents. The term “nonsecure facility” means a facility that is not characterized by the use of physically restricting construction, hardware, and procedures and which provides its residents access to the surrounding community with minimal supervision. A facility shall not be deemed secure due solely to any of the following conditions: (1) the existence within the facility of a small room for the protection of individual residents from themselves or others; (2) the adoption of regulations establishing reasonable hours for residents to come and go from the facility based upon a sensible and fair balance between allowing residents free access to the community and providing the staff with sufficient authority to maintain order, limit unreasonable actions by residents, and to ensure that minors placed in their care do not come and go at all hours of the day and night or absent themselves at will for days at a time; and (3) staff control over ingress and egress no greater than that exercised by a prudent parent. The State Department of Social Services may adopt regulations governing the use of small rooms pursuant to this section.

No minor described in this section may be held in temporary custody in any building that contains a jail or lockup for the confinement of adults, unless, while in the building, the minor is under continuous supervision and is not permitted to come into or remain in contact with adults in custody in the building. In addition, no minor who is alleged to be within the description of Section 300 may be held in temporary custody in a building that contains a jail or lockup for the confinement of adults, unless the minor is under the direct and continuous supervision of a peace officer or other child protective agency worker, as specified in Section 11165.9 of the Penal Code, until temporary custody and detention of the minor is assumed pursuant to Section 309. However, if a child protective agency worker is not available to supervise the minor as certified by the law enforcement agency which has custody of the minor, a trained volunteer may be directed to supervise the minor. The volunteer shall be trained and function under the auspices of the agency which utilizes the volunteer. The minor may not remain under the supervision of the volunteer for more than three hours. A county which elects to utilize trained volunteers for the temporary supervision of minors shall adopt guidelines for the training of the volunteers which guidelines shall be approved by the State Department of Social Services. Each county which elects to utilize trained volunteers for the temporary supervision of minors shall report annually to the department on the number of volunteers utilized, the number of minors under their supervision, and the circumstances under which volunteers were utilized.

No record of the detention of such a person shall be made or kept by any law enforcement agency or the Department of Justice as a record of arrest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 913, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

207.

(a) A minor shall not be detained in any jail, lockup, juvenile hall, or other secure facility if the minor is taken into custody solely upon the ground that the minor is a person described by Section 213.3, or described by Section 601 or adjudged to be such or made a ward of the juvenile court solely upon that ground, except as provided in subdivision (b). If any such minor, other than a minor described in subdivision (b), is detained, the minor shall be detained in a sheltered-care facility or crisis resolution home as provided for in Section 654, or in a nonsecure facility provided for in subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d) of Section 727.

(b) A minor taken into custody upon the ground that the minor is a person described in Section 601, or adjudged to be a ward of
 the juvenile court solely upon that ground, may be held in a secure facility, other than a facility in which adults are held in secure custody, in any of the following circumstances:

(1) For up to 12 hours after having been taken into custody for the purpose of determining if there are any outstanding wants, warrants, or holds against the minor in cases where the arresting officer or probation officer has cause to believe that the wants, warrants, or holds exist.

(2) For up to 24 hours after having been taken into custody, in order to locate the minor’s parent or guardian as soon as possible and to arrange the return of the minor to the minor’s parent or guardian, with the exception of an out-of-state runaway who is being held pursuant to the Interstate Compact for Juveniles.

(c) Any minor detained in juvenile hall
 pursuant to subdivision (b) shall not be permitted to come or remain in contact with any person detained on the basis that the minor has been taken into custody upon the ground that the minor is a person described in Section 602 or adjudged to be such or made a ward of the juvenile court upon that ground.

(d) Minors detained in juvenile hall pursuant to Sections 601 and 602 may be held in the same facility provided they are not permitted to come or remain in contact within that facility.

(e) Every county shall keep a record of each minor detained under subdivision (b), the place and length of time of the detention, and the reasons why the detention was necessary. Every county shall report this information to the Board of State and Community Corrections on a monthly basis, on forms to be provided by that agency.

The board shall not
 disclose the name of the detainee, or any personally identifying information contained in reports sent to the Division of Juvenile Justice under this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 289.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

207.1.

(a) A court, judge, referee, peace officer, or employee of a detention facility shall not knowingly detain any minor in a jail or lockup, unless otherwise permitted by any other law.

(b) (1) A minor 14 years of age or older who is taken into temporary custody by a peace officer on the basis of being a person described by Section 602, and who, in the reasonable belief of the peace officer, presents a serious security risk of harm to self or others, may be securely detained in a law enforcement facility that contains a lockup for adults, if all of the following conditions are met:

(A) The minor is held in
 temporary custody for the purpose of investigating the case, facilitating release of the minor to a parent or guardian, or arranging transfer of the minor to an appropriate juvenile facility.

(B) The minor is detained in the law enforcement facility for a period that does not exceed six hours except as provided in subdivision (d).

(C) The minor is informed at the time the minor is securely detained of the purpose of the secure detention, of the length of time the secure detention is expected to last, and of the maximum six-hour period the secure detention is authorized to last. In the event an extension is granted pursuant to subdivision (d), the minor shall be informed of the length of time the extension is expected to last.

(D) Contact between the minor and adults confined in the facility is restricted in accordance with Section 208.

(E) The minor is adequately supervised.

(F) A log or other written record is maintained by the law enforcement agency showing the offense that is the basis for the secure detention of the minor in the facility, the reasons and circumstances forming the basis for the decision to place the minor in secure detention, and the length of time the minor was securely detained.

(2) Any other minor, other than a minor to which paragraph (1) applies, who is taken into temporary custody by a peace officer on the basis that the minor is a person described by Section 602 may be taken to a law enforcement facility
 that contains a lockup for adults and may be held in temporary custody in the facility for the purposes of investigating the case, facilitating the release of the minor to a parent or guardian, or arranging for the transfer of the minor to an appropriate juvenile facility. While in the law enforcement facility, the minor may not be securely detained and shall be supervised in a manner so as to ensure that there will be no contact with adults in custody in the facility. If the minor is held in temporary, nonsecure custody within the facility, the peace officer shall exercise one of the dispositional options authorized by Sections 626 and 626.5 without unnecessary delay and, in every case, within six hours.

(3) “Law enforcement facility,” as used in this subdivision, includes a police station or a sheriff’s station, but does not include a
 jail, as defined in subdivision (g).

(c) The Board of State and Community Corrections shall assist law enforcement agencies, probation departments, and courts with the implementation of this section by doing all of the following:

(1) The board shall advise each law enforcement agency, probation department, and court affected by this section as to its existence and effect.

(2) The board shall make available and, upon request, shall provide, technical assistance to each governmental agency that reported the confinement of a minor in a jail or lockup in calendar year 1984 or 1985. The purpose of this technical assistance is to develop alternatives to the use of jails or lockups for the confinement of minors. These
 alternatives may include secure or nonsecure facilities located apart from an existing jail or lockup, improved transportation or access to juvenile halls or other juvenile facilities, and other programmatic alternatives recommended by the board. The technical assistance shall take any form the board deems appropriate for effective compliance with this section.

(d) (1) (A) Under the limited conditions of inclement weather, acts of God, or natural disasters that result in the temporary unavailability of transportation, an extension of the six-hour maximum period of detention set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) may be granted to a county by the Board of Corrections. The extension may be granted only by the board, on an individual, case-by-case basis. If the extension is granted, the
 detention of minors under those conditions shall not exceed the duration of the special conditions, plus a period reasonably necessary to accomplish transportation of the minor to a suitable juvenile facility, not to exceed six hours after the restoration of available transportation.

(B) A county that receives an extension under this paragraph shall comply with the requirements set forth in subdivision (b). The county also shall provide a written report to the board that specifies when the inclement weather, act of God, or natural disaster ceased to exist, when transportation availability was restored, and when the minor was delivered to a suitable juvenile facility. If the minor was detained in excess of 24 hours, the board shall verify the information contained in the report.

(2) Under the limited condition of temporary unavailability of transportation, an extension of the six-hour maximum period of detention set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) may be granted by the board to an offshore law enforcement facility. The extension may be granted only by the board, on an individual, case-by-case basis. If the extension is granted, the detention of minors under those conditions shall extend only until the next available mode of transportation can be arranged.

An offshore law enforcement facility that receives an extension under this paragraph shall comply with the requirements set forth in subdivision (b). The facility also shall provide a written report to the board that specifies when the next mode of transportation became available, and when the minor was delivered to a suitable juvenile facility. If the minor was
 detained in excess of 24 hours, the board shall verify the information contained in the report.

(3) At least annually, the board shall review and report on extensions sought and granted under this subdivision. If, upon that review, the board determines that a county has sought one or more extensions resulting in the excessive confinement of minors in adult facilities, or that a county is engaged in a pattern and practice of seeking extensions, it shall require the county to submit a detailed explanation of the reasons for the extensions sought and an assessment of the need for a conveniently located and suitable juvenile facility. Upon receiving this information, the board shall make available, and the county shall accept, technical assistance for the purpose of developing suitable alternatives to the confinement of minors in adult
 lockups.

(e) Any county that did not have a juvenile hall on January 1, 1987, may establish a special purpose juvenile hall, as defined by the Board of Corrections, for the detention of minors for a period not to exceed 96 hours. Any county that had a juvenile hall on January 1, 1987, also may establish, in addition to the juvenile hall, a special purpose juvenile hall. The board shall prescribe minimum standards for that type of facility.

(f) No part of a building or a building complex that contains a jail may be converted or utilized as a secure juvenile facility unless all of the following criteria are met:

(1) The juvenile facility is physically, or architecturally, separate and apart from the jail or lockup such
 that there could be no contact between juveniles and incarcerated adults.

(2) Sharing of nonresidential program areas only occurs where there are written policies and procedures that assure that there is time-phased use of those areas that prevents contact between juveniles and incarcerated adults.

(3) The juvenile facility has a dedicated and separate staff from the jail or lockup, including management, security, and direct care staff. Staff who provide specialized services such as food, laundry, maintenance, engineering, or medical services, who are not normally in contact with detainees, or whose infrequent contacts occur under conditions of separation of juveniles and adults, may serve both populations.

(4) The
 juvenile facility complies with all applicable state and local statutory, licensing, and regulatory requirements for juvenile facilities of its type.

(g) (1) “Jail,” as used in this chapter, means a locked facility administered by a law enforcement or governmental agency, the purpose of which is to detain adults who have been charged with violations of criminal law and are pending trial, or to hold convicted adult criminal offenders sentenced for less than one year.

(2) “Lockup,” as used in this chapter, means any locked room or secure enclosure under the control of a sheriff or other peace officer that is primarily for the temporary confinement of adults upon arrest.

(3) “Offshore law
 enforcement facility,” as used in this section, means a sheriff’s station containing a lockup for adults that is located on an island located at least 22 miles from the California coastline.

(h) This section shall not be deemed to prevent a peace officer or employee of an adult detention facility or jail from escorting a minor into the detention facility or jail for the purpose of administering an evaluation, test, or chemical test pursuant to Section 23157 of the Vehicle Code, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The minor is taken into custody by a peace officer on the basis of being a person described by Section 602 and there is no equipment for the administration of the evaluation, test, or chemical test located at a juvenile facility within a reasonable
 distance of the point where the minor was taken into custody.

(2) The minor is not locked in a cell or room within the adult detention facility or jail, is under the continuous, personal supervision of a peace officer or employee of the detention facility or jail, and is not permitted to come in contact or remain in contact with in-custody adults.

(3) The evaluation, test, or chemical test administered pursuant to Section 23157 of the Vehicle Code is performed as expeditiously as possible, so that the minor is not delayed unnecessarily within the adult detention facility or jail. Upon completion of the evaluation, test, or chemical test, the minor shall be removed from the detention facility or jail as soon as reasonably possible. A minor shall not be held in custody in an adult
 detention facility or jail under the authority of this paragraph in excess of two hours.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 125.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

207.2.

A minor who is held in temporary custody in a law enforcement facility that contains a lockup for adults pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 207.1 may be released to a parent, guardian, or responsible relative by the law enforcement agency operating the facility, or may at the discretion of the law enforcement agency be released into their own custody, provided that a minor released into their own custody is furnished, upon request, with transportation to their home or to the place where the minor was taken into custody.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 337, Sec. 17.   (SB 823)   Effective September 30, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

207.5.

Every person who misrepresents or falsely identifies himself or herself either verbally or by presenting any fraudulent written instrument to any probation officer, or to any superintendent, director, counselor, or employee of a juvenile hall, ranch, or camp for the purpose of securing admission to the premises or grounds of any juvenile hall, ranch, or camp, or to gain access to any minor detained therein, and who would not otherwise qualify for admission or access thereto, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 694, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

208.

(a) When any person under 18 years of age is detained in or sentenced to an adult facility, including a jail or other facility established for the purpose of confinement of adults, it shall be unlawful to permit that person to come or remain in contact with adults confined there.

(b) A person who is a ward or dependent child of the juvenile court who is detained in or committed to any state hospital or other state facility shall not be permitted to come or remain in contact with any adult person who has been committed to any state hospital or other state facility as a mentally disordered sex offender under the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 6300) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 6, or with any adult person
 who has been charged in an accusatory pleading with the commission of any sex offense for which registration of the convicted offender is required under Section 290 of the Penal Code and who has been committed to any state hospital or other state facility pursuant to Section 1026 or 1370 of the Penal Code.

(c) As used in this section, “contact” does not include participation in supervised group therapy or other supervised treatment activities, participation in work furlough programs, or participation in hospital recreational activities which are directly supervised by employees of the hospital, so long as living arrangements are strictly segregated and all precautions are taken to prevent unauthorized associations.

(d) This section shall be operative January 1, 1998.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 18, Sec. 2.   (SB 92)   Effective May 14, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

208.1.

(a) A county or city youth residential placement or detention center shall provide persons in their custody with accessible, functional voice communication services free of charge to the person initiating and the person receiving the communication.

(b) A county or city agency shall not receive revenue from the provision of voice communication services or any other communication services to any person confined in a county or city youth residential placement or detention center.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 827, Sec. 4.   (SB 1008)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

208.3.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Juvenile facility” includes any of the following:

(A) A juvenile hall, as described in Section 850.

(B) A juvenile camp or ranch, as described in Article 24 (commencing with Section 880).

(C) A facility of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice.

(D) A regional youth educational facility, as described in Section 894.

(E) A youth correctional center, as described in Article 9 (commencing with Section 1850) of Chapter 1 of Division 2.5.

(F) A juvenile regional facility as described in Section 5695.

(G) Any other local or state facility used for the confinement of minors or wards.

(2) “Minor” means a person who is any of the following:

(A) A person under 18 years of age.

(B) A person under the maximum age of juvenile court jurisdiction who is confined in a juvenile facility.

(C) A person under the
 jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice.

(3) “Room confinement” means the placement of a minor or ward in a locked sleeping room or cell with minimal or no contact with persons other than correctional facility staff and attorneys. Room confinement does not include confinement of a minor or ward in a locked single-person room or cell for a brief
 period lasting no longer than two hours when it is necessary for required institutional operations.

(4) “Ward” means a person who has been declared a ward of the court pursuant to Section 602.

(b) The placement of a minor or ward in room confinement shall be accomplished in accordance with the following guidelines:

(1) Room confinement shall not be used before other less restrictive options have been attempted and exhausted, unless attempting those options poses a threat to the safety or security of any minor, ward, or staff.

(2) Room confinement shall not be used for the purposes of punishment, coercion, convenience, or retaliation by staff.

(3) Room confinement shall not be used to the extent that it compromises the mental and physical health of the minor or ward.

(c) A minor or ward may be held up to four hours in room confinement. After the minor or ward has been held in room confinement for a period of four hours, staff shall do one or more of the following:

(1) Return the minor or ward to general population.

(2) Consult with mental health or medical staff.

(3) Develop an individualized plan that includes the goals and objectives to be met in order to reintegrate the minor or ward to general population.

(d) If room confinement must be extended beyond four hours, staff shall do the following:

(1) Document the reason for room confinement and the basis for the extension, the date and time the minor or ward was first placed in room confinement, and when the minor or ward is eventually released from room confinement.

(2) Develop an individualized plan that includes the goals and objectives to be met in order to reintegrate the minor or ward to general population.

(3) Obtain documented authorization by
 the facility superintendent or their designee every four hours thereafter.

(e) This section is not intended to limit the use of single-person rooms or cells for the housing of minors or wards in juvenile facilities and, except as provided in subdivision (f), does not apply to normal sleeping hours.

(f) Minors and wards who are confined shall be provided reasonable access to toilets at all hours, including during normal sleeping hours.

(g) This section does not apply to minors or wards in court holding facilities or adult facilities.

(h) This section shall not be construed to conflict with any law providing greater or additional protections to
 minors or wards.

(i) This section does not apply during an extraordinary, emergency circumstance that requires a significant departure from normal institutional operations, including a natural disaster or facilitywide threat that poses an imminent and substantial risk of harm to multiple staff, minors, or wards. This exception shall apply for the shortest amount of time needed to address the imminent and substantial risk of harm.

(j) This section does not apply when a minor or ward is placed in a locked cell or sleeping room to treat and protect against the spread of a communicable disease for the
 shortest amount of time required to reduce the risk of infection, with the written approval of a licensed physician or nurse practitioner, when the minor or ward is not required to be in an infirmary for an illness. Additionally, this section does not apply when a minor or ward is placed in a locked cell or sleeping room for required extended care after medical treatment with the written approval of a licensed physician or nurse practitioner, when the minor or ward is not required to be in an infirmary for illness.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 781, Sec. 1.   (AB 2321)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

208.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, any person whose case originated in juvenile court shall remain, if the person is held in secure detention, in a county juvenile facility until the person attains 25 years of age, except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c) of this section and Section 731. A person whose case originated in juvenile court but who was sentenced in criminal court shall not serve their sentence in a juvenile facility, but if not otherwise excluded, may remain in the juvenile facility until transferred to serve their sentence in an adult facility. This section is not intended to authorize confinement in a juvenile facility where authority would not otherwise exist.

(b) The probation department may petition the court to house a person who is 19 years
 of age or older in an adult facility, including a jail or other facility established for the purpose of confinement of adults.

(c) Upon receipt of a petition to house a person who is 19 years of age or older in an adult facility, the court shall hold a hearing. There shall be a rebuttable presumption that the person will be retained in a juvenile facility. At the hearing, the court shall determine whether the person will be moved to an adult facility, and make written findings of its decision based on the totality of the following criteria:

(1) The impact of being held in an adult facility on the physical and mental health and well-being of the person.

(2) The benefits of continued programming at the juvenile facility and whether required education and other services called for in any juvenile court disposition or
 otherwise required by law or court order can be provided in the adult facility.

(3) The capacity of the adult facility to separate younger and older people as needed and to provide them with safe and age-appropriate housing and program opportunities.

(4) The capacity of the juvenile facility to provide needed separation of older from younger people given the youth currently housed in the facility.

(5) Evidence demonstrating that the juvenile facility is unable to currently manage the person’s needs without posing a significant danger to staff or other youth in the facility.

(d) If a person who is 19 to 24 years of age, inclusive, is removed from a juvenile facility pursuant to this section, upon the motion of any party and a showing of changed
 circumstances, the court shall consider the criteria in subdivision (c) and determine whether the person should be housed at a juvenile facility.

(e) A person who is 19 years of age or older and who has been committed to a county juvenile facility or a facility of a contracted entity shall remain in the facility and shall not be subject to a petition for transfer to an adult facility. This section is not intended to authorize or extend confinement in a juvenile facility where authority would not otherwise exist.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 18, Sec. 3.   (SB 92)   Effective May 14, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

208.55.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Juvenile” means a person who meets any of the following criteria:

(A) A person under 18 years of age.

(B) A person under the maximum age of juvenile court jurisdiction who is not currently an incarcerated adult as defined by this section.

(C) A person whose case originated in the juvenile court and is subject to Section 208.5.

(2) “Juvenile facility” means a local juvenile hall, special purpose juvenile hall, ranch
 or camp, secure youth treatment facility, or any other juvenile facility that is subject to compliance monitoring by the state administrative agency designated to implement the federal Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention Act of 1974 and subsequent reauthorizations and amendments thereto (34 U.S.C. Sec. 11131 et seq.).

(3) “Sight or sound contact” means any physical, clear visual, or direct verbal contact that is not brief and inadvertent.

(4) “Subject to the jurisdiction of the juvenile court” means a person alleged or found to be subject to Section 601, 602, 607, or 875.

(5) “Incarcerated adult” means a person who is 18 years of age or older, not subject to the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, and has been arrested and is in custody for, or awaiting trial on, a criminal charge, or has been convicted of a
 criminal offense, and is not a juvenile defined under subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1).

(b) The following shall apply to persons detained in a juvenile facility as it relates to sight or sound contact:

(1) A juvenile may have sight or sound contact with other juveniles.

(2) An incarcerated adult who is detained in a juvenile facility shall not have sight and sound contact with juveniles under 18 years of age.

(3) For the purposes of clarification only, a juvenile who is still under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court and who participates in the Pine Grove Youth Conservation Camp pursuant to Section 1760.45 shall be considered a juvenile if returned to a local juvenile facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 47, Sec. 28.   (AB 134)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

209.

(a) (1) The judge of the juvenile court of a county, or, if there is more than one judge, any of the judges of the juvenile court shall, at least annually, inspect any jail, juvenile hall, lockup, special purpose juvenile hall, camp, ranch, or secure youth treatment facility situated in this state that, in the preceding calendar year, was used for confinement, for more than 24 hours, of any juvenile.

(2) The judge shall promptly notify the operator of the jail, juvenile hall, lockup, special purpose juvenile hall, camp, ranch, or secure youth treatment facility of any observed noncompliance with minimum standards for juvenile facilities adopted by the Board of State and Community Corrections under Sections 210, 875, 885, and subdivision (e)
 of Section 207.1. Based on the facility’s subsequent compliance with the provisions of subdivisions (d) and (e), the judge shall thereafter make a finding whether the facility is a suitable place for the confinement of juveniles and shall note the finding in the minutes of the court.
